Mississippi statutes. Title 39. Libraries, Arts, Archives and History
Chapter 32. Mississippi Country and Western Music Commission

§ 39-32-1.
Mississippi Country and Western Music Commission created; commission powers, functions and composition; report; disposition of funds received by commission.

There is hereby created the Mississippi Country and Western Music Commission, hereinafter referred to as the “commission.” The commission may accept and expend grants and private donations from any source, including federal, state, public and private entities, to assist it to carry out its functions.

For purposes of this chapter, the term “country and western music” shall mean country and western, blue grass and related music genre and the culture that created it.

The powers, functions and duties of the commission shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

To study, deliberate and report to the Governor and the Legislature on or before January 1, 2012, on the best method to market and foster an appreciation of country and western music, to include tourism, academic study and country and western music archives, country and western music historical preservation, country and western music cultural education and the support of performing artists. Such marketing plan shall be designed to attract tourists, conferences, music performances, filmmakers and others for the purpose of economic development of all geographic areas of the state through the promotion of country and western music and the heritage and culture that produced such, and to analyze the tourism potential of the country and western music for Mississippi.

To make an inventory of country and western music “assets” that make up country and western music and its culture that could be developed into a program for domestic and international tourism, and opportunities for investment.

Coordination with the Division of Tourism of the Mississippi Development Authority, the Department of Archives and History, the Mississippi Department of Transportation, the Mississippi Educational Television Authority, the state institutions of higher learning, the Center for the Study of Southern Culture at the University of Mississippi, the Mississippi Arts Commission, and similar organizations to share resources and information in order to ensure a comprehensive approach to marketing the country and western music culture in Mississippi.

To make recommendations regarding the establishment of, and budgeting for, a permanent Mississippi office of country and western music as an agency of state government with an executive director and appropriate staff to carry out the marketing plan developed by the commission. To the extent practical, any office shall be located at an existing public or private location which is appropriate to the country and western music culture in Mississippi, with minimal cost to the state.

Coordination of the country and western music marketing plan with any existing state historic preservation programs, in order to:

Identify and preserve country and western music historic properties;

Determine the eligibility of such properties for listing on the National Register;

Prepare nominations of such sites for inclusion on the National Register;

Maintenance of country and western music historical and archaeological data bases; and

Evaluation of such sites for eligibility for state and federal preservation incentives.

To implement and continue the development and creation of the Mississippi Country Music Trail as outlined in Section 39-33-1, provide oversight of the trail and its infrastructure, and explore funding opportunities to support continued implementation.

The commission shall be composed of the following members:

The Director of the Division of Tourism of the Mississippi Development Authority;

The Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Archives and History, or his designee;

The Executive Director of the Mississippi Arts Commission, or his designee;

The Executive Director of the Mississippi Educational Television Authority, or his designee;

The Chairman of the Board of the Southern Arts and Entertainment Center, or his designee;

The Director of the Center for the Study of Southern Culture at the University of Mississippi;

The State Director of the USDA Rural Development Agency;

Two (2) members of the Mississippi Senate designated by the Lieutenant Governor, who shall serve on a nonvoting basis;

Two (2) members of the Mississippi House of Representatives designated by the Speaker of the House, who shall serve on a nonvoting basis;

Two (2) members appointed by the Governor, who shall have experience in cultural affairs or tourism development in East Central Mississippi; and

Four (4) members appointed by the Governor from the state at large, who shall have demonstrated a commitment to the understanding and promotion of country and western music.

The Governor shall designate one (1) commission member to serve as chairman for a term concurrent with that of the Governor. The commission shall meet upon the call of the chairman not later than July 1, 2011, and shall organize for business by adopting internal organizational procedures necessary for efficient operation of the commission, including officers, quorum requirements and policies for any commission staff. Each member of the commission shall designate necessary staff of their departments to provide administrative support to assist the commission in performing its duties and responsibilities. The commission shall meet and conduct business at least quarterly. Meetings of the commission shall be open to the public and opportunity for public comment shall be made available.

Members of the commission shall receive no compensation for their services.

The commission shall submit a report, including any proposed legislation, to the Governor and to the Legislature before the convening of the 2012 Regular Session. The report shall include a comprehensive state plan for marketing country and western music history as specifically provided above.

All departments, boards, agencies, officers and institutions of the state and all subdivisions thereof shall cooperate with the commission in carrying out its purposes under this chapter.

Any funds or donations received by the commission shall be deposited into a special fund which is hereby created in the State Treasury, and disbursement therefrom shall be made upon warrants by the Department of Finance and Administration after receipt of requisitions submitted by the appropriate person designated by the commission. Monies in the special fund may be used by the commission in carrying out its responsibilities under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 495, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2015, ch. 350, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.